Washington statutes.
RCW 43.325.100

Framework to mitigate climate change—Report.

(1) The department of commerce and the department of ecology shall develop a framework for the state of Washington to participate in emerging regional, national, and to the extent possible, global markets to mitigate climate change, on a multisector basis. This framework must include, but not be limited to, credible, verifiable, replicable inventory and accounting methodologies for each sector involved, along with the completion of the stakeholder process identified in executive order number 07-02 creating the Washington state climate change challenge.

(2) The department of commerce and the department of ecology shall include the forestry sector and work closely with the department of natural resources on those recommendations.

(3) The department must provide a report to the legislature by December 1, 2008. The report may be included within the report produced for executive order number 07-02.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2079; 2007 c 348 s 403.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.